Vermont, session 2025-2026, S109.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 164 is amended to read:
§ 164. ADULT COURT DIVERSION PROGRAM
(a) Purpose.
(1) The Attorney General shall develop and administer an adult court
diversion program, for both pre-charge and post-charge referrals, available in
all counties.
(2) The program shall be designed to provide a restorative option for
persons alleged to have caused harm in violation of a criminal statute or who
have been charged with violating a criminal statute as well as for victims or
those acting on a victim’s behalf who have been allegedly harmed by the
responsible party person referred to the program. The diversion program can
accept referrals to the program as follows:
* * *
(c) Adult diversion program policy and referral requirements.
* * *
(3) Adult post-charge diversion requirements. Each State’s Attorney, in
cooperation with the Office of the Attorney General and the adult post-charge
diversion program, shall develop clear criteria for deciding what types of
offenses and offenders will be eligible for diversion; however, the State’s
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 2 of 29
2025
Attorney shall retain final discretion over the referral of each case for
diversion. All adult post-charge diversion programs receiving financial
assistance from the Attorney General shall adhere to the following:
(A) The post-charge diversion program for adults shall only accept
persons against whom charges have been filed and the court has found
probable cause, but are not adjudicated.
(B) A prosecutor may refer a person to diversion either before or
after arraignment and shall notify in writing the diversion program and the
court of the prosecutor’s of the referral to diversion.
* * *
Sec. 2. 4 V.S.A. § 71 is amended to read:
§ 71. APPOINTMENT AND TERM OF SUPERIOR JUDGES
(a) There shall be 34 Superior judges, whose term of office shall, The
number of Superior judges shall be as determined by the General Assembly.
The term of office of a Superior judge shall, except in the case of an
appointment to fill a vacancy or unexpired term, begin on April 1 in the year of
their appointment or retention and continue for six years.
* * *
Sec. 3. 4 V.S.A. § 1102 is amended to read:
§ 1102. JUDICIAL BUREAU; JURISDICTION
(a) The Judicial Bureau is created within the Judicial Branch under the
supervision of the Supreme Court.
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 3 of 29
2025
(b) The Judicial Bureau shall have jurisdiction of the following matters:
* * *
(4) Violations of 7 V.S.A. § 1005, relating to possession and
procurement of tobacco products by a person under 21 years of age.
* * *
Sec. 4. 4 V.S.A. § 1106 is amended to read:
§ 1106. HEARING
* * *
(d) A Unless otherwise provided by law, a law enforcement officer may
void or amend a complaint issued by that officer by so marking the complaint
and returning it to the Bureau, regardless of whether the amended complaint is
a lesser included violation. At the hearing, a law enforcement officer may,
unless otherwise provided by law, void or amend a complaint issued by that
officer in the discretion of that officer.
* * *
Sec. 5. 7 V.S.A. § 1005(c) is amended to read:
(c) A person under 21 years of age who misrepresents his or her the
person’s age by presenting false identification to purchase tobacco products,
tobacco substitutes, or tobacco paraphernalia shall be fined subject to a civil
penalty of not more than $50.00 or provide up to 10 hours of community
service, or both.
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 4 of 29
2025
Sec. 6. 12 V.S.A. § 5 is amended to read:
§ 5. DISSEMINATION OF ELECTRONIC CASE RECORDS
(a) The Court shall not permit public access via the Internet internet to
criminal, family, or probate case records. The Court may permit criminal
justice agencies, as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 2056a, Internet internet access to
criminal case records for criminal justice purposes, as defined in 20 V.S.A.
§ 2056a.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Court shall provide
licensed Vermont attorneys in good standing with access via the internet,
through the Judiciary’s public portal website or otherwise, to nonconfidential
criminal, family, and probate case records.
(c) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the Court from providing
electronic access to:
(1) court schedules of the Superior Court or opinions of the Criminal
Division of the Superior Court;
(2) State agencies in accordance with data dissemination contracts
entered into under Rule 12 of the Vermont Rules for Public Access to Court
Records; or
(3) decisions, recordings of oral arguments, briefs, and printed cases of
the Supreme Court.
Sec. 7. 12 V.S.A. § 4937 is amended to read:
§ 4937. ATTORNEY’S FEES
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 5 of 29
2025
When a mortgage contains an agreement on the part of the mortgagor to pay
the mortgagee, in the event of foreclosure, the attorney’s fees incident thereto,
and claim is made therefor in the complaint, upon hearing, the court in which
the complaint is brought shall allow such fee as in its judgment is just.
Sec. 8. 13 V.S.A. § 4013 is amended to read:
§ 4013. ZIP GUNS; SWITCHBLADE KNIVES
A person who possesses, sells, or offers for sale a weapon commonly
known as a “zip” gun, or a weapon commonly known as a switchblade knife,
the blade of which is three inches or more in length, shall be imprisoned not
more than 90 days or fined not more than $100.00, or both.
Sec. 9. EXPUNGEMENT OF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
The court shall order the expungement of criminal history records of
convictions of 13 V.S.A. § 4013 for possessing, selling, or offering for sale a
switchblade knife that occurred prior to July 1, 2025. The process and effect
for expungement of these records shall be as provided for in 13 V.S.A. § 7606
and shall be completed by the court and all entities subject to the order not later
than July 1, 2026.
Sec. 10. 13 V.S.A. § 5351(7) is amended to read:
(7) “Victim” means:
(A) a person who sustains injury or death as a direct result of the
commission or attempted commission of a crime;
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 6 of 29
2025
(B) an intervenor who is physically injured or killed in an attempt to
assist the person described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (7) or the
police a protected professional as defined in subdivision 1028(d)(1) of this
title;
(C) a surviving immediate family member of a homicide victim,
including a spouse, domestic partner, parent, sibling, child, grandparent, or
other survivor who may suffer severe emotional harm as a result of the
victim’s death as determined on a case-by-case basis in the discretion of the
Board; or
(D) a resident of this State who is injured or killed as the result of a
crime committed outside the United States.
Sec. 11. 13 V.S.A. § 7282 is amended to read:
§ 7282. SURCHARGE
* * *
(c) SIU surcharge. In addition to any penalty or fine imposed by the court
for a criminal offense committed after July 1, 2009, the clerk of the court shall
levy an additional surcharge of $100.00 to be deposited in the General Fund, in
support of the Specialized Investigative Unit Grants Board created in 24
V.S.A. § 1940(c), and used to pay for the costs of Specialized Investigative
Units.
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 7 of 29
2025
Sec. 12. 14 V.S.A. § 2 is amended to read:
§ 2. DEPOSIT OF WILL FOR SAFEKEEPING; DELIVERY; FINAL
DISPOSITION
(a) A will may be deposited for safekeeping in the Probate Division of the
Superior Court for the district in which the testator resides on payment to the
court of the applicable fee required by 32 V.S.A. § 1434(a)(17) 32 V.S.A.
§ 1434(a)(18). The register shall give to the testator a receipt, shall safely keep
each will so deposited, and shall keep an index of the wills so deposited.
* * *
Sec. 13. 14 V.S.A. § 3068 is amended to read:
§ 3068. HEARING
* * *
(e)(1) If upon completion of the hearing and consideration of the record the
court finds that the respondent is not a person in need of guardianship, it shall
dismiss the petition and seal the records of the proceeding.
(2) If a motion to withdraw the petition is made before the final hearing,
the court shall dismiss the petition and seal the records of the proceeding.
(f) If upon completion of the hearing and consideration of the record the
court finds that the petitioner has proved by clear and convincing evidence that
the respondent is a person in need of guardianship or will be a person in need
of guardianship on attaining 18 years of age, it shall enter judgment specifying
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 8 of 29
2025
the powers of the guardian pursuant to sections 3069 and 3070 of this title and
the duties of the guardian pursuant to section 3071 of this title.
(g) Any party to the proceeding before the court may appeal the court’s
decision in the manner provided in section 3080 of this title.
Sec. 14. 14 V.S.A. § 4051 is amended to read:
§ 4051. STATUTORY FORM POWER OF ATTORNEY
A document substantially in the following form may be used to create a
statutory form power of attorney that has the meaning and effect prescribed by
this chapter.
VERMONT STATUTORY FORM POWER OF ATTORNEY IMPORTANT
INFORMATION
* * *
GRANT OF SPECIFIC AUTHORITY (OPTIONAL)
My agent MAY NOT do any of the following specific acts for me UNLESS I
have INITIALED the specific authority listed below:
(CAUTION: Granting any of the following will give your agent the authority
to take actions that could significantly reduce your property or change how
your property is distributed at your death. INITIAL ONLY the specific
authority you WANT to give your agent.)
( ) An agent who is not an ancestor, spouse, or descendant may exercise
authority under this power of attorney to create in the agent or in an individual
to whom the agent owes a legal obligation of support an interest in my
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 9 of 29
2025
property whether by gift, rights of survivorship, beneficiary designation,
disclaimer, or otherwise
( ) Create, amend, revoke, or terminate an inter vivos, family, living,
irrevocable, or revocable trust
( ) Consent to the modification or termination of a noncharitable irrevocable
trust under 14A V.S.A. § 411
( ) Make a gift, subject to the limitations of 14 V.S.A. § 4047 (gifts) and any
special instructions in this power of attorney
( ) Consent to the modification or termination of a noncharitable irrevocable
trust under 14A V.S.A. § 411
( ) Create, amend, or change rights of survivorship
( ) Create, amend, or change a beneficiary designation
( ) Waive the principal’s right to be a beneficiary of a joint and survivor
annuity, including a survivor benefit under a retirement plan
( ) Exercise fiduciary powers that the principal has authority to delegate
( ) Authorize another person to exercise the authority granted under this power
of attorney
( ) Disclaim or refuse an interest in property, including a power of appointment
( ) Exercise authority with respect to elective share under 14 V.S.A. § 319
( ) Exercise waiver rights under 14 V.S.A. § 323
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 10 of 29
2025
( ) Exercise authority over the content and catalogue of electronic
communications and digital assets under 14 V.S.A. chapter 125 (Vermont
Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act)
( ) Exercise authority with respect to intellectual property, including, without
limitation, copyrights, contracts for payment of royalties, and trademarks
( ) Convey, or revoke or revise a grantee designation, by enhanced life estate
deed pursuant to 27 V.S.A. chapter 6 or under common law.
* * *
Sec. 15. 14A V.S.A. § 1316 is amended to read:
§ 1316. OFFICE OF TRUST DIRECTOR
Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, the rules applicable to a
trustee apply to a trust director regarding the following matters:
(1) acceptance under section 701 of this title;
(2) giving of bond to secure performance under section 702 of this title;
(3) reasonable compensation under section 708 of this title;
(4) resignation under section 705 of this title;
(5) removal under section 706 of this title; and
(6) vacancy and appointment of successor under section 704 of this title.
Sec. 16. 33 V.S.A. § 5204(b)(2)(A) is amended to read:
(2)(A)(i) The Family Division of the Superior Court shall hold a hearing
under subsection (c) of this section to determine whether jurisdiction should be
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 11 of 29
2025
transferred to the Criminal Division under subsection (a) of this section if the
delinquent act set forth in the petition is:
(I) [Repealed.]
(II) human trafficking or aggravated human trafficking in
violation of 13 V.S.A. § 2652 or 2653;
(III) defacing a firearm’s serial number in violation of 13
V.S.A. § 4024 13 V.S.A. § 4026; or
(IV) straw purchasing of firearm in violation of 13 V.S.A.
§ 4025; and
(ii) the child had attained 16 years of age but not 19 years of age at
the time the act was alleged to have occurred.
Sec. 17. 33 V.S.A. § 5225 is amended to read:
§ 5225. PRELIMINARY HEARING; RISK ASSESSMENT
(a) Preliminary hearing. A preliminary hearing shall be held at the time
and date specified on the citation or as otherwise ordered by the court. If a
child is taken into custody prior to the preliminary hearing, the preliminary
hearing shall be at the time of the temporary care hearing. Counsel for the
child shall be assigned prior to the preliminary hearing.
(b) Risk and needs screening.
(1) Prior to the preliminary hearing, the child shall be afforded an
opportunity to undergo a risk and needs screening, which shall be conducted
by the Department or by a community provider that has contracted with the
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 12 of 29
2025
Department to provide risk and need screenings for children alleged to have
committed delinquent acts.
(2) If the child participates in such a screening, the Department or the
community provider shall report the risk level result of the screening, the
number and source of the collateral contacts made, and the recommendation
for charging or other alternatives to the State’s Attorney. The State’s Attorney
shall consider the results of the risk and needs screening in determining
whether to file a charge. In lieu of filing a charge, the State’s Attorney may
refer a child directly to a youth-appropriate community-based provider that has
been approved by the Department, which may include pre-charge diversion
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 163, a community justice center, or a balanced and
restorative justice program. Referral to a community-based provider pursuant
to this subsection shall not require the State’s Attorney to file a charge. If the
community-based provider does not accept the case or if the child fails to
complete the program in a manner deemed satisfactory and timely by the
provider, the child’s case shall return to the State’s Attorney for charging
consideration.
* * *
Sec. 18. 27 V.S.A. § 348 is amended to read:
§ 348. INSTRUMENTS CONCERNING REAL PROPERTY VALIDATED
(a) When an instrument of writing shall have been on record in the office of
the clerk in the proper town for a period of 15 years, and there is a defect in the
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 13 of 29
2025
instrument because it omitted to state any consideration or was not sealed,
witnessed, acknowledged, validly acknowledged, or because a license to sell
was not issued or is defective, the instrument shall, from and after the
expiration of 15 years from the filing thereof for record, be valid. Nothing in
this section shall be construed to affect any rights acquired by grantees,
assignees, or encumbrancers under the instruments described in the preceding
sentence, nor shall this section apply to conveyances or other instruments of
writing, the validity of which is brought in question in any suit now pending in
any courts of the State.
* * *
(d) A release, discharge, or assignment of mortgage interest executed by a
commercial lender with respect to a one- to four-family residential real
property, including a residential unit in a condominium or in a common
interest community as defined in Title 27A, that recites authority to act on
behalf of the record holder of the mortgage under a power of attorney but
where the power of attorney is not of record shall have the same effect as if
executed by the record holder of the mortgage unless, within three years after
the instrument is recorded, an action challenging the release, discharge, or
assignment is commenced and a copy of the complaint is recorded in the land
records of the town where the release, discharge, or assignment is recorded.
This subsection shall not apply to releases, discharges, or assignments obtained
by fraud or forgery.
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 14 of 29
2025
(e) A power of attorney made for the purpose of conveying, leasing,
mortgaging, or affecting any interest in real property that has been
acknowledged and signed in the presence of at least one witness shall be valid,
notwithstanding its failure to comply with 14 V.S.A. § 3503 or the
requirements of the Emergency Administrative Rules for Remote Notarial Acts
adopted by the Vermont Secretary of State, unless within three years after
recording, an action challenging its validity is commenced and a copy of the
complaint is recorded in the land records of the town where the power of
attorney is recorded. This subsection shall not apply to a power of attorney
obtained by fraud or forgery.
(f) Notwithstanding section 305 of this title, a deed, mortgage, lease, or
other instrument executed for the purpose of conveying or encumbering real
property executed by a person purporting to act as the agent or attorney-in-fact
for the party named in the deed, mortgage, lease, or other instrument that has
been recorded for at least 15 years in the land records where the real property
is located shall be valid even if no power of attorney authorizing and
empowering an agent or attorney-in-fact appears of record, unless, within 15
years after recording, an action challenging the validity of the deed, mortgage,
lease, or other instrument is commenced and a copy of the complaint is
recorded in the land records of the town where the property is located. This
subsection shall not apply to an instrument obtained by fraud or forgery.
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 15 of 29
2025
Sec. 19. 32 V.S.A. § 1003 is amended to read:
§ 1003. STATE OFFICERS
* * *
(c) The officers of the Judicial Branch named in this subsection shall be
entitled to annual salaries as follows:
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Chief Justice of Supreme Court $214,024 $225,581
(2) Each Associate Justice $204,264 $215,294
(3) Administrative Chief Superior Judge $204,264 $215,294
(4) Each Superior Judge $194,185 $204,671
(5) [Repealed.]
(6) Each Magistrate $146,413 $154,319
(7) Each Judicial Bureau hearing
officer $146,413 $154,319
* * *
Sec. 20. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. 5 (forensic facility report) is
amended to read:
Sec. 5. [Deleted.]
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 16 of 29
2025
Sec. 21. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 40, Sec. 4 is amended to read:
Sec. 4. REPEALS
* * *
(c) 28 V.S.A. § 126 (Coordinated Justice Reform Advisory Council) is
repealed on July 1, 2028 July 1, 2025.
Sec. 22. [Deleted.]
Sec. 23. [Deleted.]
Sec. 24. FIREARM SURRENDER ORDER COMPLIANCE WORKING
GROUP; REPORT
(a) Creation. The Office of the Attorney General shall convene a Firearm
Surrender Order Compliance Working Group to develop a uniform process to
ensure compliance with court orders to surrender firearms. The Working
Group shall examine the statutory or policy changes necessary to create a
uniform process to monitor compliance, support entities charged with storing
and returning surrendered firearms pursuant to court orders, and identify a
stable and reliable funding source for any additional resources needed to
monitor compliance.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Attorney General or designee, who shall be the chair;
(2) the Chief Superior Court Judge or designee;
(3) the Defender General or designee;
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 17 of 29
2025
(4) one State’s Attorney or designee, appointed by the Department of
State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs;
(5) a member, appointed by the Vermont Network Against Domestic
and Sexual Violence;
(6) a member of the Vermont State Police, appointed by the
Commissioner of Public Safety;
(7) a police chief, appointed by the Vermont Association of Chiefs of
Police;
(8) a federal firearms licensee, appointed by the Attorney General;
(9) the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services; and
(10) the Vermont Council on Domestic Violence.
(c) Consultation. The Working Group shall consult with stakeholders
including:
(1) the Commissioner of Corrections;
(2) family law practitioners;
(3) victim advocates;
(4) advocates from culturally specific advocacy organizations that work
with domestic violence victims;
(5) the Vermont Federation of Sportsmen’s Clubs;
(6) the Vermont Office of the Bureau of Alcohol Tobacco and Firearms;
(7) the Vermont Medical Society;
(8) the Commissioner of Mental Health; and
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 18 of 29
2025
(9) the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife.
(d) Report. On or before November 15, 2025, the Working Group shall
report its recommendations to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary
and to the Joint Legislative Justice Oversight Committee. The report shall
include:
(1) a workable statewide compliance model that is adaptable to both the
Family and Criminal Divisions of the Superior Courts and that ensures:
(A) accountability of respondents and defendants while addressing
safety needs of the plaintiffs and victims; and
(B) proper storage and return of firearms surrendered pursuant to
court orders; and
(2) recommendations for any legislative changes necessary to support
the model.
(e) Meetings. The Working Group shall meet not more than six times.
(f) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Working Group
who are not employees of the State of Vermont or who are not otherwise
compensated or reimbursed for their attendance shall be entitled to
compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 1010
for not more than six meetings.
Sec. 25. 15A V.S.A. § 3-504 is amended to read:
§ 3-504. GROUNDS FOR TERMINATING RELATIONSHIP OF PARENT
AND CHILD
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 19 of 29
2025
(a) If a respondent answers or appears at the hearing and asserts parental
rights, the court shall proceed with the hearing expeditiously. If the court
finds, upon clear and convincing evidence, that any one of the following
grounds exists and that termination is in the best interests of the minor, the
court shall order the termination of any parental relationship of the respondent
to the minor:
* * *
(2) In the case of a minor over six months of age at the time the petition
is filed, the respondent did not exercise parental responsibility for a period of
at least six months immediately preceding the filing of the petition. In making
a determination under this subdivision, the court shall consider all relevant
factors, which may include the respondent’s failure to:
(A) make reasonable and consistent payments, in accordance with the
respondent’s financial means, for the support of the minor, although legally
obligated to do so;
(B) regularly communicate or visit with the minor; or
(C) during any time the minor was not in the physical custody of the
other parent, manifest an ability and willingness to assume legal and physical
custody of the minor.
* * *
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 20 of 29
2025
Sec. 25a. 33 V.S.A. § 5231(d) is amended to read:
(d) Termination of parental rights. If the Commissioner or the attorney for
the child seeks an order terminating parental rights of one or both parents and
transfer of custody to the Commissioner without limitation as to adoption, the
court shall consider the best interests of the child in accordance with section
5114 of this title. The Department’s Family Services Division shall not
consider payment of child support to the Family Services Division to offset the
cost of foster care as a factor in a petition to terminate parental rights.
Sec. 25b. 33 V.S.A. § 5317(d) is amended to read:
(d) Termination of parental rights. If the Commissioner or the attorney for
the child seeks an order at disposition terminating the parental rights of one or
both parents and transfer of legal custody to the Commissioner without
limitation as to adoption, the court shall consider the best interests of the child
in accordance with section 5114 of this title. The Department’s Family
Services Division shall not consider payment of child support to the Family
Services Division to offset the cost of foster care as a factor in a petition to
terminate parental rights.
Sec. 26. 15 V.S.A. § 202 is amended to read:
§ 202. PENALTY FOR DESERTION OR NONSUPPORT
A married person who, without just cause, shall desert or willfully neglect
or refuse to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her the person’s
spouse and children, leaving them in destitute or necessitous circumstances or
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 21 of 29
2025
a parent who, without lawful excuse, shall desert or willfully neglect or refuse
to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her the child or an adult
child possessed of sufficient pecuniary or physical ability to support his or her
parents, who unreasonably neglects or refuses to provide such support when
the parent is destitute, unable to support himself or herself, and resident in this
State, shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than
$300.00, or both. Should a fine be imposed, the court may order the same to
be paid in whole or in part to the needy spouse, parent, or to the guardian,
custodian, or trustee of the child. The Office of Child Support attorneys, in
addition to any other duly authorized person, may prosecute cases under this
section in Vermont Superior Court.
Sec. 27. 28 V.S.A. § 818 is amended to read:
§ 818. EARNED TIME; REDUCTION OF TERM
* * *
(b) The earned time program implemented pursuant to this section shall
comply with the following standards:
* * *
(4) The Department shall:
(A) ensure that all victims of record are notified of the earned time
program at its outset and made aware of the option to receive notifications
from the Department pursuant to this subdivision;
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 22 of 29
2025
(B) provide timely notice not less frequently than every 90 days to
the offender, and to any victim who opts to receive the notice, any time the
offender receives a reduction in his or her the offender’s term of supervision
pursuant to this section;
(C) maintain a system that documents and records all such reductions
in each offender’s permanent record; and
(D) record any reduction in an offender’s term of supervision
pursuant to this section on a monthly basis and ensure that victims who want
information regarding changes in scheduled an offender’s minimum release
dates date have access to such information.
* * *
Sec. 28. VICTIM NOTIFICATION SYSTEM TASK FORCE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Victim Notification System Task Force
to review and improve the responsiveness of Vermont’s victim notification
system.
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Commissioner of Corrections or designee;
(2) the Executive Director of the Center for Crime Victim Services or
designee;
(3) the Executive Director of the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs or designee;
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 23 of 29
2025
(4) a member, appointed by the Vermont Network Against Domestic
and Sexual Violence;
(5) the Victims Service Director of the Vermont State Police;
(6) two persons who are either victims or survivors of crimes, appointed
by the Center for Crime Victim Services; and
(7) a member, appointed by the Commissioner of Corrections, who is
familiar with the capability and technical operations of the VINE system.
(c) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall study the current state of
Vermont’s victim notification system, including:
(1) improving victims’ accessibility to information;
(2) ensuring that the entire notification process is trauma-informed,
including all notifications, communications, and informational materials;
(3) expanding the use of automated notification systems in order to
increase options and maximize communication choices for victims and
survivors; and
(4) recommendations for necessary training and resources.
(d) Assistance. The Task Force shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Department of Corrections.
(e) Report. On or before November 15, 2025, the Task Force shall submit
its findings and recommendations as a written report in the form of proposed
legislation to the Joint Legislative Justice Oversight Committee, the House
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 24 of 29
2025
Committees on Corrections and Institutions and on Judiciary, and the Senate
Committees on Institutions and on Judiciary.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Commissioner of Corrections or designee shall call the first
meeting of the Task Force to occur on or before August 1, 2025.
(2) The Committee shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Task Force shall cease to exist on February 15, 2026.
Sec. 29. 4 V.S.A. § 39 is amended to read:
§ 39. CAPITAL BUDGET REQUESTS; COUNTY COURTHOUSES
(a) On or before October 1 each year, any county requesting capital funds
for its courthouse, or court operations, shall submit a request to the Court
Administrator. As used in this subsection, “court operations” does not include
operating expenses.
(b) The Court Administrator shall evaluate requests based on the following
criteria:
(1) whether the funding request is consistent with a capital program
developed pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 133(e)(3);
(2) whether the project that is the subject of the request has been
included in the list of capital projects in the county’s budget pursuant to 24
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 25 of 29
2025
V.S.A. § 133(e)(1), and, if so, the description of the project included in the
budget;
(3) whether the county has established a capital reserve fund pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 133(e)(3), and, if so, the amount of annual contributions the
county has made to the fund;
(4) whether the funding request relates to an emergency that will affect
the court operations and the administration of justice;
(2)(5) whether there is a State-owned courthouse in the county that
could absorb court activities in lieu of this capital investment;
(3)(6) whether the county consistently has invested in major
maintenance in the courthouse;
(4)(7) whether the request relates to a State-mandated function;
(5)(8) whether the request diverts resources of other current Judiciary
capital priorities;
(6)(9) whether the request is consistent with the long-term capital needs
of the Judiciary, including providing court services adapted to modern needs
and requirements; and
(7)(10) any other criteria as deemed appropriate by the Court
Administrator.
(c) Based on the criteria described in subsection (b) of this section, the
Court Administrator shall make a recommendation to the Commissioner of
Buildings and General Services regarding whether the county’s request should
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 26 of 29
2025
be included as part of the Judiciary’s request for capital funding in the
Governor’s annual proposed capital budget request.
(d) On or before January 15 of each year, the Court Administrator shall
advise the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate
Committee on Institutions of all county requests received and the Court
Administrator’s recommendations for the proposed capital budget request.
Sec. 30. 23 V.S.A. § 1210(c) is amended to read:
(c) Second offense. A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this
title who has been convicted of another violation of that section within the last
20 years shall be fined not more than $1,500.00 or imprisoned not more than
two years, or both. At least 200 80 hours of community service shall be
performed, or 60 consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be
served and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised
sentence, except that credit for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for
time served in a residential alcohol facility pursuant to sentence if the program
is successfully completed.
Sec. 31. INTENT
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of
Corrections ensures gender parity in the access to services and programs that
strengthen family connections.
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 27 of 29
2025
(b) It is the further intent of the General Assembly that the Department of
Corrections develop a phased plan to expand the application of 28 V.S.A.
§ 128 to all Vermont correctional facilities by 2028.
Sec. 32. 28 V.S.A. § 102(c) is amended to read:
(c) The Commissioner is charged with the following responsibilities:
* * *
(24) To provide and sustain trauma-informed family support services
and programming pursuant to section 128 of this title.
Sec. 33. 28 V.S.A. § 128 is added to read:
§ 128. INCARCERATED PARENTS AND GUARDIANS; FAMILY
SUPPORT PROGRAM
(a) Family Support Program. The Department of Corrections shall
establish the Family Support Program to provide free parenting and family
support at each correctional facility to all incarcerated individuals who are
parents and guardians regardless of gender. The Program shall include
individualized services and programming intended to provide:
(1) increased knowledge and skill for incarcerated parents and guardians
to address the specific needs of their children;
(2) resources to incarcerated parents and guardians to engage in needs-
specific planning and communication strategies with their children and their
children’s caregivers;
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 28 of 29
2025
(3) child-friendly visitation spaces, in consultation with the Department,
for in-person and virtual visits between parents or guardians and their children,
including establishing safety protocol;
(4) outreach and coordination with appropriate services for the children
of incarcerated parents and guardians and the children’s caregivers;
(5) improved cross-system coordination and collaboration to deliver
necessary services to the families of incarcerated parents and guardians; and
(6) reentry support and preparation for incarcerated parents and
guardians.
(b) Program support. The Department may support the operation of the
Family Support Program established pursuant to this section through grants of
financial assistance to, or contracts for services with, any nonprofit entity that
meets the Department’s requirements.
(c) Annual report. Annually, on or before July 1, the Department shall
submit a written report to the House Committees on Corrections and
Institutions and on Judiciary and the Senate Committees on Institutions and on
Judiciary concerning:
(1) the funding, participation, and outcomes of the services and
programming established pursuant to this section; and
(2) considerations and any progress towards sustained statewide
programming and gender parity.
VT LEG #384289 v.1

No. 64 Page 29 of 29
2025
Sec. 34. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FAMILY SUPPORT
PROGRAM; IMPLEMENTATION
The Department of Corrections shall first implement the Family Support
Program established under 28 V.S.A. § 128 at the Chittenden Regional
Correctional Facility and Northern State Correctional Facility.
Sec. 35. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that Sec. 1 shall take effect on
July 2, 2025 and Sec. 29 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 12, 2025
VT LEG #384289 v.1